Utah statutes.
63A-5-219.   Transfer from project reserve monies.
(1)  With the approval of and through an appropriation by the Legislature, the
division shall transfer at least $100,000 annually from the project reserve
monies to the General Fund to pay for personal service expenses associated
with the management of construction projects.
(2)  With the approval of and as directed by the Legislature, the division
shall transfer additional monies from the project reserve monies to pay
administrative costs associated with the management of construction projects
and other division responsibilities.
